Mississippi, session 2026, HB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 25-3-96, Mississippi Code of 1972: 25-3-96.  An employee who has used earned personal leave, major medical leave or a combination of personal and major medical leave in order to be paid his or her regular compensation while taking leave under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA) is authorized to buy back all or any portion of the personal or major medical leave used while taking FMLA leave, by paying to his or her employer the amount of the net compensation received during the use of the personal or major medical leave.  Upon payment of the required amount for the personal or major medical leave being purchased, the appropriate amount of the employee's personal or major medical leave shall be reinstated to the credit of the employee. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.